test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_laigu_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:
  Noun - láigu: # ok LAIGU
    láigu+N+Sg+Nom:  láigu
    láigu+N+Sg+Gen:  lááigu
    láigu+N+Sg+Acc:  lááigu
    láigu+N+Sg+Ill:  lááigun
    láigu+N+Sg+Loc:  lááigust
    láigu+N+Sg+Com:  láigoin
    láigu+N+Sg+Abe:  láˊiguttáá
    láigu+N+Ess:  láigun
    láigu+N+Ess:  láigud
    láigu+N+Pl+Nom:  lááiguh
    láigu+N+Pl+Gen: [lááigui, láˊigui]
    láigu+N+Pl+Acc:  lááiguid
    láigu+N+Pl+Ill:  láigoid
    láigu+N+Pl+Loc:  lááiguin
    láigu+N+Pl+Com:  láˊiguiguin
    láigu+N+Pl+Abe:  láˊiguittáá

  Noun - sáigu: # ok LAIGU
    sáigu+N+Sg+Nom:  sáigu
    sáigu+N+Sg+Gen:  sááigu
    sáigu+N+Sg+Acc:  sááigu
    sáigu+N+Sg+Ill:  sááigun
    sáigu+N+Sg+Loc:  sááigust
    sáigu+N+Sg+Com:  sáigoin
    sáigu+N+Sg+Abe:  sáˊiguttáá
    sáigu+N+Ess:  sáigun
    sáigu+N+Par:  sáigud
    sáigu+N+Pl+Nom:  sááiguh
    sáigu+N+Pl+Gen: [sááigui, sáˊigui]
    sáigu+N+Pl+Acc:  sááiguid
    sáigu+N+Pl+Ill:  sáigoid
    sáigu+N+Pl+Loc:  sááiguin
    sáigu+N+Pl+Com:  sáˊiguiguin
    sáigu+N+Pl+Abe:  sáˊiguittáá

  Noun - áimu: # ok LAIGU
    áimu+N+Sg+Nom:  áimu
    áimu+N+Sg+Gen:  ááimu
    áimu+N+Sg+Acc:  ááimu
    áimu+N+Sg+Ill:  ááimun
    áimu+N+Sg+Loc:  ááimust
    áimu+N+Sg+Com:  áimoin
    áimu+N+Sg+Abe:  áˊimuttáá
    áimu+N+Ess:  áimun
    áimu+N+Par:  áimud
    áimu+N+Pl+Nom:  ááimuh
    áimu+N+Pl+Gen: [ááimui, áˊimui]
    áimu+N+Pl+Acc:  ááimuid
    áimu+N+Pl+Ill:  áimoid
    áimu+N+Pl+Loc:  ááimuin
    áimu+N+Pl+Com:  áˊimuiguin
    áimu+N+Pl+Abe:  áˊimuittáá


  Noun - váimu: # ok LAIGU
    váimu+N+Sg+Nom:  váimu
    váimu+N+Sg+Gen:  vááimu
    váimu+N+Sg+Acc:  vááimu
    váimu+N+Sg+Ill:  vááimun
    váimu+N+Sg+Loc:  vááimust
    váimu+N+Sg+Com:  váimoin
    váimu+N+Sg+Abe:  váˊimuttáá
    váimu+N+Ess:  váimun
    váimu+N+Par:  váimud
    váimu+N+Pl+Nom:  vááimuh
    váimu+N+Pl+Gen: [vááimui, váˊimui]
    váimu+N+Pl+Acc:  vááimuid
    váimu+N+Pl+Ill:  váimoid
    váimu+N+Pl+Loc:  vááimuin
    váimu+N+Pl+Com:  váˊimuiguin
    váimu+N+Pl+Abe:  váˊimuittáá

  Noun - áiru: # ok LAIGU
    áiru+N+Sg+Nom:  áiru
    áiru+N+Sg+Gen:  ááiru
    áiru+N+Sg+Acc:  ááiru
    áiru+N+Sg+Ill:  ááirun
    áiru+N+Sg+Loc:  ááirust
    áiru+N+Sg+Com:  áiroin
    áiru+N+Sg+Abe:  áˊiruttáá
    áiru+N+Ess:  áirun
    áiru+N+Par:  áirud
    áiru+N+Pl+Nom:  ááiruh
    áiru+N+Pl+Gen: [ááirui, áˊirui]
    áiru+N+Pl+Acc:  ááiruid
    áiru+N+Pl+Ill:  áiroid
    áiru+N+Pl+Loc:  ááiruin
    áiru+N+Pl+Com:  áˊiruiguin
    áiru+N+Pl+Abe:  áˊiruittáá

  Noun - káivu: # OK LAIGU
    káivu+N+Sg+Nom:  káivu
    káivu+N+Sg+Gen:  kááivu
    káivu+N+Sg+Acc:  kááivu
    káivu+N+Sg+Ill:  kááivun
    káivu+N+Sg+Loc:  kááivust
    káivu+N+Sg+Com:  káivoin
    káivu+N+Sg+Abe:  káˊivuttáá
    káivu+N+Ess:  káivun
    káivu+N+Par:  káivun
    káivu+N+Pl+Nom:  kááivuh
    káivu+N+Pl+Gen: [kááivui, káˊivui]
    káivu+N+Pl+Acc:  kááivuid
    káivu+N+Pl+Ill:  káivoid
    káivu+N+Pl+Loc:  kááivuin
    káivu+N+Pl+Com:  káˊivuiguin
    káivu+N+Pl+Abe:  káˊivuittáá

  Noun - ráiđu: # ok LAIGU
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Nom:  ráiđu
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Gen:  rááiđu
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Acc:  rááiđu
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Ill:  rááiđun
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Loc:  rááiđust
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Com:  ráiđoin
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Abe:  ráˊiđuttáá
    ráiđu+N+Ess:  ráiđun
    ráiđu+N+Par:  ráiđud
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Nom:  rááiđuh
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Gen: [rááiđui, ráˊiđui]
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Acc:  rááiđuid
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Ill:  ráiđoid
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Loc:  rááiđuin
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Com:  ráˊiđuiguin
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Abe:  ráˊiđuittáá

  Noun - tárbu: #ok LAIGU
    tárbu+N+Sg+Nom:  tárbu
    tárbu+N+Sg+Gen:  táárbu
    tárbu+N+Sg+Acc:  táárbu
    tárbu+N+Sg+Ill:  táárbun
    tárbu+N+Sg+Loc:  táárbust
    tárbu+N+Sg+Com:  tárboin
    tárbu+N+Sg+Abe:  táˊrbuttáá
    tárbu+N+Ess:  tárbun
    tárbu+N+Par:  tárbud
    tárbu+N+Pl+Nom:  táárbuh
    tárbu+N+Pl+Gen: [táárbui, táˊrbui]
    tárbu+N+Pl+Acc:  táárbuid
    tárbu+N+Pl+Ill:  tárboid
    tárbu+N+Pl+Loc:  táárbuin
    tárbu+N+Pl+Com:  táˊrbuiguin
    tárbu+N+Pl+Abe:  táˊrbuittáá

  Noun - áldu: # ok LAIGU
    áldu+N+Sg+Nom:  áldu
    áldu+N+Sg+Gen:  ááldu
    áldu+N+Sg+Acc:  ááldu
    áldu+N+Sg+Ill:  ááldun
    áldu+N+Sg+Loc:  ááldust
    áldu+N+Sg+Com:  áldoin
    áldu+N+Sg+Abe:  áˊlduttáá
    áldu+N+Ess:  áldun
    áldu+N+Par:  áldud
    áldu+N+Pl+Nom:  áálduh
    áldu+N+Pl+Gen: [ááldui, áˊldui]
    áldu+N+Pl+Acc:  áálduid
    áldu+N+Pl+Ill:  áldoid
    áldu+N+Pl+Loc:  áálduin
    áldu+N+Pl+Com:  áˊlduiguin
    áldu+N+Pl+Abe:  áˊlduittáá

  Noun - rávdu: # ok LAIGU
    rávdu+N+Sg+Nom:  rávdu
    rávdu+N+Sg+Gen:  ráávdu
    rávdu+N+Sg+Acc:  ráávdu
    rávdu+N+Sg+Ill:  ráávdun
    rávdu+N+Sg+Loc:  ráávdust
    rávdu+N+Sg+Com:  rávdoin
    rávdu+N+Sg+Abe:  ráˊvduttáá
    rávdu+N+Ess:  rávdun
    rávdu+N+Par:  rávdud
    rávdu+N+Pl+Nom:  ráávduh
    rávdu+N+Pl+Gen: [ráávdui, ráˊvdui]
    rávdu+N+Pl+Acc:  ráávduid
    rávdu+N+Pl+Ill:  rávˊdoid
    rávdu+N+Pl+Loc:  ráávduin
    rávdu+N+Pl+Com:  ráˊvduiguin
    rávdu+N+Pl+Abe:  ráˊvduittáá

  Noun - kálgu: # ok LAIGU
    kálgu+N+Sg+Nom:  kálgu
    kálgu+N+Sg+Gen:  káálgu
    kálgu+N+Sg+Acc:  káálgu
    kálgu+N+Sg+Ill:  káálgun
    kálgu+N+Sg+Loc:  káálgust
    kálgu+N+Sg+Com:  kálgoin
    kálgu+N+Sg+Abe:  káˊlguttáá
    kálgu+N+Ess:  kálgun
    kálgu+N+Par:  kálgud
    kálgu+N+Pl+Nom:  káálguh
    kálgu+N+Pl+Gen: [káálgui, káˊlgui]
    kálgu+N+Pl+Acc:  káálguid
    kálgu+N+Pl+Ill:  kálgoid
    kálgu+N+Pl+Loc:  káálguin
    kálgu+N+Pl+Com:  káˊlguiguin
    kálgu+N+Pl+Abe:  káˊlguittáá

  Noun - kárgu: # ok LAIGU
    kárgu+N+Sg+Nom:  kárgu
    kárgu+N+Sg+Gen:  káárgu
    kárgu+N+Sg+Acc:  káárgu
    kárgu+N+Sg+Ill:  káárgun
    kárgu+N+Sg+Loc:  káárgust
    kárgu+N+Sg+Com:  kárgoin
    kárgu+N+Sg+Abe:  káˊrguttáá
    kárgu+N+Ess:  kárgun
    kárgu+N+Par:  kárgud
    kárgu+N+Pl+Nom:  káárguh
    kárgu+N+Pl+Gen: [káárgui, káˊrgui]
    kárgu+N+Pl+Acc:  káárguid
    kárgu+N+Pl+Ill:  kárgoid
    kárgu+N+Pl+Loc:  káárguin
    kárgu+N+Pl+Com:  káˊrguiguin
    kárgu+N+Pl+Abe:  káˊrguittáá

  Noun - ávju: # ok LAIGU
    ávju+N+Sg+Nom:  ávju
    ávju+N+Sg+Gen:  áávju
    ávju+N+Sg+Acc:  áávju
    ávju+N+Sg+Ill:  áávjun
    ávju+N+Sg+Loc:  áávjust
    ávju+N+Sg+Com:  ávjoin
    ávju+N+Sg+Abe:  áˊvjuttáá
    ávju+N+Ess:  ávjun
    ávju+N+Par:  ávjud
    ávju+N+Pl+Nom:  áávjun
    ávju+N+Pl+Gen: [áávjui, áˊvjui]
    ávju+N+Pl+Acc:  áávjuid
    ávju+N+Pl+Ill:  ávjoid
    ávju+N+Pl+Loc:  áávjuin
    ávju+N+Pl+Com:  áˊvjuiguin
    ávju+N+Pl+Abe:  áˊvjuittáá

  Noun - sátku: # ok LAIGU
    sátku+N+Sg+Nom:  sátku
    sátku+N+Sg+Gen:  sááđhu
    sátku+N+Sg+Acc:  sááđhu
    sátku+N+Sg+Ill:  sáátkun
    sátku+N+Sg+Loc:  sááđhust
    sátku+N+Sg+Com:  sáđhoin
    sátku+N+Sg+Abe:  sáˊđhuttáá
    sátku+N+Ess:  sátkun
    sátku+N+Par:  sátkud
    sátku+N+Pl+Nom:  sááđhuh
    sátku+N+Pl+Gen: [sááđhui, sáˊđhui]
    sátku+N+Pl+Acc:  sááđhuid
    sátku+N+Pl+Ill:  sáđhoid
    sátku+N+Pl+Loc:  sááđhuin
    sátku+N+Pl+Com:  sáˊđhuiguin
    sátku+N+Pl+Abe:  sáˊđhuittáá

  Noun - rášku: # ok LAIGU
    rášku+N+Sg+Nom:  rášku
    rášku+N+Sg+Gen:  ráášku
    rášku+N+Sg+Acc:  ráášku
    rášku+N+Sg+Ill:  rááškun
    rášku+N+Sg+Loc:  rááškust
    rášku+N+Sg+Com:  ráškoin
    rášku+N+Sg+Abe:  ráˊškuttáá
    rášku+N+Ess:  ráškun
    rášku+N+Par:  ráškud
    rášku+N+Pl+Nom:  rááškuh
    rášku+N+Pl+Gen: [rááškui, ráˊškui]
    rášku+N+Pl+Acc:  rááškuid
    rášku+N+Pl+Ill:  ráškoid
    rášku+N+Pl+Loc:  rááškuin
    rášku+N+Pl+Com:  ráˊškuiguin
    rášku+N+Pl+Abe:  ráˊškuittáá


  Noun - ármu: # ok LAIGU
    ármu+N+Sg+Nom:  ármu
    ármu+N+Sg+Gen:  áármu
    ármu+N+Sg+Acc:  áármu
    ármu+N+Sg+Ill:  áármun
    ármu+N+Sg+Loc:  áármust
    ármu+N+Sg+Com:  ármoin
    ármu+N+Sg+Abe:  áˊrmuttáá
    ármu+N+Ess:  ármun
    ármu+N+Par:  ármud
    ármu+N+Pl+Nom:  áármuh
    ármu+N+Pl+Gen: [áármui, áˊrmui]
    ármu+N+Pl+Acc:  áármuid
    ármu+N+Pl+Ill:  ármoid
    ármu+N+Pl+Loc:  áármuin
    ármu+N+Pl+Com:  áˊrmuiguin
    ármu+N+Pl+Abe:  áˊrmuittáá


  Noun - vávnu: # ok LAIGU
    vávnu+N+Sg+Nom:  vávnu
    vávnu+N+Sg+Gen:  váávnu
    vávnu+N+Sg+Acc:  váávnu
    vávnu+N+Sg+Ill:  váávnun
    vávnu+N+Sg+Loc:  váávnust
    vávnu+N+Sg+Com:  vávnoin
    vávnu+N+Sg+Abe:  váˊvnuttáá
    vávnu+N+Ess:  vávnun
    vávnu+N+Par:  vávnud
    vávnu+N+Pl+Nom:  váávnuh
    vávnu+N+Pl+Gen: [váávnui, váˊvnui]
    vávnu+N+Pl+Acc:  váávnuid
    vávnu+N+Pl+Ill:  vávnoid
    vávnu+N+Pl+Loc:  váávnuin
    vávnu+N+Pl+Com:  váˊvnuiguin
    vávnu+N+Pl+Abe:  váˊvnuittáá


  Noun - máksu+v1: # ok; SgCom + PlIll cehcked with Ilmari Mattus; IM: vs; MLO: vss; both are in use LAIGU
    máksu+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  máksu
    máksu+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  máávsu
    máksu+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  máávsu
    máksu+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  mááksun
    máksu+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  máávsust
    máksu+v1+N+Sg+Com:  mávsoin
    máksu+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  máˊvsuttáá
    máksu+v1+N+Ess:  máksun
    máksu+v1+N+Par:  máksud
    máksu+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  máávsuh
    máksu+v1+N+Pl+Gen: [máávsui, máˊvsui]
    máksu+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  máávsuid
    máksu+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  mávsoid
    máksu+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  máávsuin
    máksu+v1+N+Pl+Com:  máˊvsuiguin
    máksu+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  máˊvsuittáá

  Noun - áptu: # ok LAIGU
    áptu+N+Sg+Nom:  áptu
    áptu+N+Sg+Gen:  ááptu
    áptu+N+Sg+Acc:  ááptu
    áptu+N+Sg+Ill:  ááptun
    áptu+N+Sg+Loc:  ááptust
    áptu+N+Sg+Com:  áptoin
    áptu+N+Sg+Abe:  áˊptuttáá
    áptu+N+Ess:  áptun
    áptu+N+Par:  áptud
    áptu+N+Pl+Nom:  ááptuh
    áptu+N+Pl+Gen: [ááptui, áˊptui]
    áptu+N+Pl+Acc:  ááptuid
    áptu+N+Pl+Ill:  áptoid
    áptu+N+Pl+Loc:  ááptuin
    áptu+N+Pl+Com:  áˊptuiguin
    áptu+N+Pl+Abe:  áˊptuittáá

  Noun - vástu: # ok LAIGU
    vástu+N+Sg+Nom:  vástu
    vástu+N+Sg+Gen:  váástu
    vástu+N+Sg+Acc:  váástu
    vástu+N+Sg+Ill:  váástun
    vástu+N+Sg+Loc:  váástust
    vástu+N+Sg+Com:  vástoin
    vástu+N+Sg+Abe:  váˊstuttáá
    vástu+N+Ess:  vástun
    vástu+N+Par:  vástud
    vástu+N+Pl+Nom:  váástuh
    vástu+N+Pl+Gen: [váástui, váˊstui]
    vástu+N+Pl+Acc:  váástuid
    vástu+N+Pl+Ill:  vástoid
    vástu+N+Pl+Loc:  váástuin
    vástu+N+Pl+Com:  váˊstuiguin
    vástu+N+Pl+Abe:  váˊstuittáá


  Noun - kálvu: # ok LAIGU
    kálvu+N+Sg+Nom:  kálvu
    kálvu+N+Sg+Gen:  káálvu
    kálvu+N+Sg+Acc:  káálvu
    kálvu+N+Sg+Ill:  káálvun
    kálvu+N+Sg+Loc:  káálvust
    kálvu+N+Sg+Com:  kálvoin
    kálvu+N+Sg+Abe:  káˊlvuttáá
    kálvu+N+Ess:  kálvun
    kálvu+N+Par:  kálvud
    kálvu+N+Pl+Nom:  káálvuh
    kálvu+N+Pl+Gen: [káálvui, káˊlvui]
    kálvu+N+Pl+Acc:  káálvuid
    kálvu+N+Pl+Ill:  kálvoid
    kálvu+N+Pl+Loc:  káálvuin
    kálvu+N+Pl+Com:  káˊlvuiguin
    kálvu+N+Pl+Abe:  káˊlvuittáá

  Noun - árvu: # ok LAIGU
    árvu+N+Sg+Nom:  árvu
    árvu+N+Sg+Gen:  áárvu
    árvu+N+Sg+Acc:  áárvu
    árvu+N+Sg+Ill:  áárvun
    árvu+N+Sg+Loc:  áárvust
    árvu+N+Sg+Com:  árvoin
    árvu+N+Sg+Abe:  áˊrvuttáá
    árvu+N+Ess:  árvun
    árvu+N+Par:  árvun
    árvu+N+Pl+Nom:  áárvuh
    árvu+N+Pl+Gen: [áárvui, áˊrvui]
    árvu+N+Pl+Acc:  áárvuid
    árvu+N+Pl+Ill:  árvoid
    árvu+N+Pl+Loc:  áárvuin
    árvu+N+Pl+Com:  áˊrvuiguin
    árvu+N+Pl+Abe:  áˊrvuittáá

  Noun - várvu: # ok LAIGU
    várvu+N+Sg+Nom:  várvu
    várvu+N+Sg+Gen:  váárvu
    várvu+N+Sg+Acc:  váárvu
    várvu+N+Sg+Ill:  váárvun
    várvu+N+Sg+Loc:  váárvust
    várvu+N+Sg+Com:  várvoin
    várvu+N+Sg+Abe:  váˊrvuttáá
    várvu+N+Ess:  várvun
    várvu+N+Par:  várvud
    várvu+N+Pl+Nom:  váárvuh
    várvu+N+Pl+Gen: [váárvui, váˊrvui]
    várvu+N+Pl+Acc:  váárvuid
    várvu+N+Pl+Ill:  várvoid
    várvu+N+Pl+Loc:  váárvuin
    várvu+N+Pl+Com:  váˊrvuiguin
    várvu+N+Pl+Abe:  váˊrvuittáá
